Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201285-2415
Recurrent authorization to
operate or authorization to operate on a continuing basis; nontransferable;
change in ownership; application for new recurrent authorization;
failure to apply; effect.

The recurrent authorization to operate or authorization
to operate on a continuing basis shall be issued to the owner or governing
body of the postsecondary institution and shall be nontransferable. If there
is a change in ownership, as defined by the commission in rules and regulations,
the new owner or governing body shall, within thirty days after the change
of ownership, apply for a new recurrent authorization
to operate under the Postsecondary Institution Act, and if the institution
fails to apply within such time period, the original authorization to operate
shall terminate. An application for a new recurrent authorization
to operate may be deemed an application for renewal of the institution's original
authorization, except that
such renewal shall be given in the form of a recurrent authorization to operate
even if the original authorization was an authorization to operate on a continuing
basis. Verification
that all student records are transferred intact and in good condition to the
new owner shall accompany the application.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 15;

Laws 2012, LB1104, § 21.